Utah statutes.
49-15-401.   Eligibility for service retirement -- Date of retirement -- Qualifications.

(1)  A member is qualified to receive an allowance from this system when:

(a)  except as provided under Subsection (3), the member ceases actual work for every participating employer that employs the member before the member's retirement date and provides evidence of the termination;

(b)  the member has submitted to the office a notarized retirement application form that states the member's proposed retirement date; and

(c)  one of the following conditions is met as of the member's retirement date:

(i)  the member has accrued at least 20 years of service credit;

(ii)  the member has accrued at least 10 years of service credit and has attained an age of 60 years; or

(iii)  the member has accrued at least four years of service and has attained an age of 65 years.

(2) (a)  The member's retirement date:

(i)  shall be the 1st or the 16th day of the month, as selected by the member;

(ii)  shall be on or after the date of termination; and

(iii)  may not be more than 90 days before or after the date the application is received by the office.

(b) Except as provided under Subsection (3), a member may not be employed by a participating employer in the system established by this chapter on the retirement date selected under Subsection (2)(a)(i).

(3) (a)  A member who is employed by a participating employer and who is also an elected official is not required to cease service as an elected official to be qualified to receive an allowance under Subsection (1), unless the member is retiring from service as an elected official.

(b)  A member who is employed by a participating employer and who is also a part-time appointed board member is not required to cease service as a part-time appointed board member to be qualified to receive an allowance under Subsection (1).



Amended by Chapter 215, 2013 General Session

